Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-607
Airport, landing field, airdrome; location and specifications; approval.

No airport, landing field, or airdrome shall be acquired by any county through the issue and sale of bonds, or the levy of taxes, until the location and specifications thereof shall have been approved by the appropriate department or agency of the United States Government.

Laws 1969, c. 141, § 7, p. 650.